Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2983.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Houck Chapter; Navajo Nation; capital improvement projects The sum of $5,152,600 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo Nation for the Houck Chapter for capital improvement projects.